Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1626
Person, defined.

Person means any individual, partnership, limited liability company, association, public or private corporation, trustee, receiver, assignee, agent, municipality, other political subdivision, public agency, or other legal entity or any officer or governing or managing body of any public or private corporation, municipality, other political subdivision, public agency, or other legal entity.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 26.